Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.170

Allotment of appropriations for school plant facilities—Additional allotment authorized—Effect of allotment on future disbursements to district.

If a school district which has qualified for an allotment of state funds under the provisions of RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180 for school building construction is found by the superintendent of public instruction, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel, to have a school housing emergency requiring an allotment of state funds in excess of the amount allocable under RCW 28A.525.166, an additional allotment may be made to such district: PROVIDED, That the total amount allotted shall not exceed ninety percent of the total cost of the approved project which may include the cost of the site and equipment. At any time thereafter when the superintendent finds that the financial position of such school district has improved through an increase in its taxable valuation or through retirement of bonded indebtedness or through a reduction in school housing requirements, or for any combination of these reasons, the amount of such additional allotment, or any part of such amount as the superintendent determines, shall be deducted, under terms and conditions prescribed by the superintendent, from any state school building construction funds which might otherwise be provided to such district.

[ 2006 c 263 s 313; 1990 c 33 s 459; 1974 ex.s. c 56 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.47.805, 28.47.805.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 28A.525.162.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 244: See note following RCW 28A.525.162.